Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. Secretary of Education

§ 211.
Repealed. 2011, No. 98 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. January 1, 2013.

§ 212.
Secretary’s duties generally.

The Secretary shall execute those policies adopted by the State Board in the legal exercise of its powers and shall:

Coordinate the educational work of the public schools with higher education in the State.

Identify the educational goals of the public schools, provide alternative methods of attaining those goals, and promote education in the State.

Evaluate the program of instruction in the public schools.

Advise the General Assembly concerning proposed laws affecting the public schools.

Supervise and direct the execution of the laws relating to the public schools and ensure compliance.

Supervise the expenditure and distribution of all money appropriated by the State under the provisions of this title for public schools.

Arrange conferences and summer schools for superintendents and teachers and employ suitable speakers, lecturers, and instructors for the same; fix the amount of tuition for the instruction; provide for educational gatherings, institutes, summer schools, and other supplementary educational activities; and provide for cooperation with the Board of Libraries established by

22 V.S.A. § 602

or the State Librarian.

Inform citizens of the condition of and opportunities within the public education system and provide other educational publicity for the enlightenment and well-being of the citizens of the State.

Establish requirements for information to be submitted by school districts, including necessary statistical data and other information and ensure, to the extent possible, that data are reported in a uniform way. Data collected under this subdivision shall include budget surplus amounts, reserve fund amounts, and information concerning the purpose and use of any reserve funds.

Make recommendations to school boards regarding transportation policies.

Provide an educational facilities planning service to make available technical assistance and comprehensive information on school construction, school systems design, component technology and suppliers, and similar subjects to public schools, school districts, and independent schools, for the purpose of helping them to achieve flexibility and economy in construction, to retain the potential for modification and expansion of educational facilities, and to attain the lowest maintenance costs consistent with educational needs.

Distribute at his or her discretion upon request to approved independent schools appropriate forms and materials relating to the education quality standards for elementary and secondary students.

Ensure the provision of services to children and adolescents with a severe emotional disturbance in coordination with the Departments of Mental Health, for Children and Families, and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living pursuant to the provisions of 33 V.S.A. chapter 43.

Annually, communicate to each superintendent a list of information that a supervisory union, a school board, a school district, a school, a school district employee, or a supervisory union employee is required under State or federal law to make available to the electorate, community members, parents, or students. It is the intent of this subdivision that the Secretary shall make a good faith effort to compile a complete list of the information to be made available. Due to the difficult nature of compiling such a list, it is also the intent that failure to include relevant information on the list shall not constitute grounds for an action against the Secretary.

Annually, with the Commissioner of Health, shall jointly inform superintendents and principals of appropriate practices regarding students with life-threatening allergies and chronic illnesses; and prepare and distribute policies, training materials, and school guidelines for managing students with life-threatening allergies and chronic illnesses, including family responsibilities, school responsibilities, and student responsibilities.

Annually, convene a meeting of directors of Vermont educator preparation programs and representatives of school boards, superintendents, principals, educators, and the Vermont Standards Board to determine subject and geographic areas in which there is a critical need for educators and to discuss ways to meet the need.

Encourage and facilitate collaboration among school districts and supervisory unions to share information and expertise regarding low-incidence special education needs.

Annually, inform superintendents and principals of regional resources available to assist schools to provide instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of automated external defibrillators and provide updated information to the education community regarding the provision of a comprehensive health education.

Establish an information clearinghouse and accessible database to help districts share information about educational programs and practices that improve student performance. Educational programs and practices include those designed to create and sustain a safe learning environment.

Develop, in consultation with the Secretary of State, and make available to school boards sample ballot language for issues that may be decided by Australian ballot and for which no statutory language exists.

Prepare a budget for the Agency and submit it to the Governor after review by the State Board.

Annually, prior to September 1, present the Governor’s education policy priorities to the State Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 26; amended

1977, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

1999, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2000;

2005, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 82

, § 25;

2011, No. 58

, § 8, eff. May 31, 2011;

2011, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 1, 2013;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 11, 2012;

2011, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 16, 2012;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 23

, § 20;

2015, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2019;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 56;

2021, No. 66

, § 4, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 213.
Deputy secretaries.

The Secretary shall employ such number of deputy secretaries as he or she deems necessary.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 26; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 214.
Repealed. 1997, No. 163 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 215.
Challenge to Excellence grants.

Purpose and findings. It is a goal of the General Assembly to promote quality education for every Vermont child and to create an opportunity for every Vermont student to achieve his or her personal best, while respecting divergent student goals and personal learning styles and abilities. The General Assembly finds that a school’s climate for learning is improved when parents, community members, and business leaders actively participate in promoting educational opportunities for every student. Further, it is the compassion and innovation of individual teachers and school personnel that often create the impetus for students to achieve excellence in education.

Grant Program. The Secretary shall establish and implement a Challenge to Excellence Grant Program for the purpose of promoting quality education for Vermont students. Eligible applicants include Vermont public schools, including regional career technical centers, and Vermont supervisory unions on behalf of a school or schools. All proposals shall be to develop or carry out a comprehensive plan, which may be an action plan pursuant to subdivision 165(a)(1) of this title, to create educational opportunities for each student within the school. Any plan shall be developed with the involvement of parents and other community members, staff, and business representatives and shall be designed to assist students in meeting State Board and school board standards. Grants shall be for up to $50,000.00 and shall include a 1-1 match from other sources of funding, including grants from businesses, foundations, or other federal or local funding. Priority shall be given to schools that the Secretary finds are having difficulty meeting the quality standards listed in subsection 165(a) of this title or are making insufficient progress in improving student performance in relation to the standards set forth in subdivision 164(9) of this title. Eligible activities include:

a comprehensive planning and goal-setting process to promote a quality education for all students within the school;

activities to carry out a comprehensive plan to promote quality education for students within the school; and

innovative methods to create educational opportunities for students according to a comprehensive plan, including special classes and activities; mentorship; summer institutes on math, science, reading and language arts, social studies, service, the arts, or technology; partnerships for learning with businesses, postsecondary schools, and community organizations; tutorials; programs for at-risk or gifted students; and guidance, peer counseling, and career planning activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 60

, § 7, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2021, No. 20

, § 54.

§ 216.
Redesignated. 2013, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.